North Carolina, session 2025, HB738.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 54 of S.L. 2014-120 is repealed.
SECTION 1.(b) Section 4.18 of S.L. 2015-286 is repealed.
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 143-212 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-212. Definitions.
Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions apply to this
Article and Articles 21A and 21B of this Chapter:
…
(3a) "Isolated wetlands" means (i) wetlands confirmed to be isolated by the United
States Army Corps of Engineers prior to June 22, 2020, and (ii) wetlands
described as a basin wetland or bog in the North Carolina Wetland Assessment
User Manual prepared by the North Carolina Wetland Functional Assessment
Team, version 4.1, October 2010. The term "isolated wetland" does not
include an isolated man-made ditch or pond constructed for stormwater
management purposes or any other man-made isolated pond.
…
(6) "Waters" means any stream, river, brook, swamp, lake, sound, tidal estuary,
bay, creek, reservoir, waterway, waterway, wetland, or other body or
accumulation of water, whether surface or underground, public or private, or
natural or artificial, that is contained in, flows through, or borders upon any
portion of this State, including any portion of the Atlantic Ocean over which
the State has jurisdiction.
(7) "Wetland" means waters that are areas that are inundated or saturated by an
accumulation of surface or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient
to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of
vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands do
not include prior converted cropland as defined in the National Food Security
Act Manual, Fifth Edition. Wetlands classified as waters of the State are
limited to (i) waters of the United States as defined by 33 C.F.R. § 328.3 and
40 C.F.R. § 230.3 and (ii) isolated wetlands."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H738-v-1*